Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-820
County judge; selection; retained in office; vacancy, how filled.

County judges shall be selected and retained in office in accordance with the provisions of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska. Each judge shall (1) be selected for a term of six years, and (2) hold office until his successor is selected and qualified. Any vacancy in the office of county judge shall be filled in the same manner as vacancies are filled under the provisions of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution.

Laws 1974, LB 785, § 2.